Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201548-605
Commissioner; salary.

The commissioner, for his or her services with respect to the administration of the Employment Security Law, shall receive the salary of the commissioner as set out in section 81-103.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 10, p. 389;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 15, p. 254;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 15, p. 401;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-710;

R.S.1943, § 48-605;

Laws 1947, c. 175, § 3, p. 572;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 3, p. 420;

Laws 1961, c. 239, § 1, p. 712;

Laws 1984, LB 747, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB271, § 4.
August 30, 2015